Utah statutes.
58-40a-201.   Board composition -- Duties and responsibilities.

(1)  There is created the Athletic Trainers Licensing Board consisting of four licensed athletic trainers, one member representative of the directing physicians referred to in Subsection 58-40a-102(6), and one member of the general public who has never been authorized to practice a healing art and never had a substantial personal, business, professional, or pecuniary connection with a healing art or with a medical education or health care facility, except as a client or potential client.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The board shall carry out the duties and responsibilities in Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203, and shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee under this chapter; and

(b)  advise the division of its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.

